Mississippi, session 2026, HB1545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Any professional engineer, as defined under Section 17-3-1, or professional engineering firm, shall only assess fees or costs that are direct fees or costs for any services provided to a municipality within the state.  In no event shall a professional engineer or professional engineering firm, as prescribed under this section, include markups when assessing fees or costs to a municipality for services performed for a municipality. As used in this section, the term "markup" means adding a percentage or fixed amount to the direct cost of services provided to cover indirect costs, overhead and profit, and the term "municipality" shall have the same meaning ascribed under Section 21-1-1. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect from and after July 1, 2026.